Arkansas, session 2025, HB1921.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 9, Chapter 28, Subchapter 4, is amended
to add additional sections to read as follows:
9-28-417. Foster home training — Limitation on hours required.
(a) The Division of Children and Family Services shall not require a
foster home to obtain more than:
(1) Fifteen (15) hours of initial training to become an approved
foster home; or
(2) Six (6) hours of annual training to maintain the foster
home's status as an approved foster home.
(b) The division may reduce the hourly requirements under subsection
(a) of this section by rule.
*LJH174*
04-03-2025 11:10:37 LJH174

As Engrossed: H4/3/25 HB1921

9-28-418. Provisional foster home — Streamlined process.
(a) The Division of Children and Family Services shall not require a
provisional foster home to undergo the same amount of hourly training under §
9-28-417.
(b) The division shall promulgate rules under this section to
streamline the training process for a provisional foster home.

/s/Torres



























04-03-2025 11:10:37 LJH174